Maryland, session 2026, HB0915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Aging Out of Foster Care.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0915*

HOUSE BILL 915
(i) 15 individuals who are at least 18 years old and under the age of
25 years, who:
1. have aged out of foster care;
2. are currently aging out of foster care; or
3. are members of the Department of Human Services’ Youth
Advisory Board; and
(ii) a representative of:
1. the Court–Appointed Special Advocate Program;
2. the Legal Aid Bureau;
3. the Maryland Association of Resources for Families and
Youth;
4. the Maryland Chapter of the American Academy of
Pediatrics;
5. the Maryland Chapter of the National Association of
Social Workers;
6. the Maryland Behavioral Health Coalition;
7. the Governor’s Office for Children;
8. the Maryland Association of Local Management Boards;
9. the Karabelle Pizzigati Initiative in Advocacy for
Children, Youth and Families at the University of Maryland;
10. Disability Rights Maryland;
11. the State Citizens Review Board for Children;
12. the Coalition to Protect Maryland’s Children;
13. the Office of the Public Defender;
14. the Maryland Youth Justice Coalition; and
15. Free State Justice;

HOUSE BILL 915 3
16. the Maryland Chapter of the National Association of
Pediatric Nurse Practitioners; and
17. the Social Services Administration’s Emerging Adults
Program.
(c) The Workgroup shall select a member to serve as chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect Citizens Review Board for
Children shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) (1) A member of the Workgroup is entitled to reimbursement for expenses
under the Standard State Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall award a one–time stipend of
$2,000 to each member of the Workgroup appointed under subsection (b)(5)(i) of this
section.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) identify the types of resources currently available for youth who have
aged out of foster care to achieve self–sufficiency, including stable housing, food security,
reliable transportation, educational programs, employment, physical and behavioral health
care services, disability accommodations, financial resources, and other services to address
basic needs;
(2) determine the effectiveness of currently available resources, and
identify challenges with current services and programs that are offered before a youth ages
out of the system and seek to assist youth to successfully transition into adulthood and
self–sufficiency;
(3) determine the types of resources that youth who have aged out of foster
care are most likely to utilize when seeking continuing support, such as adults, peers,
financial assistance organizations, and community groups;
(4) identify the circumstances under which youth in foster care were
removed from the youth’s home county during any period of foster care; and
(5) identify programs that have successfully improved outcomes for youth
who have aged out of foster care, such as a hotline or an anonymous support line.
(g) On or before June 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall submit a report of its findings
and recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June

HOUSE BILL 915
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.